src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Proper noun inflection
Nenets proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
nouns, but with a XXX as separator.

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ for bunclassified ones

### ONE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEM
**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

### ONE-SYLLABLE CONSONANT-FINAL STEM
**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

### TWO-SYLLABLE CONSONANT-FINAL STEM
* **LEXICON PROP_ПАНЫ** пӑны:пӑны 9

* **LEXICON PROP_ХАНО** хӑн: 11P ProsSg -увна
Yaml: **xano**

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

* **LEXICON PROP_ЯЛЭ** яля: 18 ProsSg -вна
/total=2/
яля yalya    ялян’ yalyan°h  яляˮ yalyaq     ялэ yale

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

* **LEXICON PROP_ХАСЕВ** хасава: 22 ProsSg -вна
/total=1/
хасава xasawa        хасаван’ xasawan°h      хасаваˮ xasawaq хасев xasyew°
* **+N+Prop: POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

### THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEM
**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@  Here we need some kind of vowel harmony

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-yrk/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>

---
